Utah statutes.
41-6a-1611.   Hazard warning lamps.

(1)  A vehicle manufactured with hazard warning lights shall be equipped with hazard warning lights for the purpose of warning the operators of other vehicles of the presence of a vehicular traffic hazard requiring the exercise of unusual care in approaching, overtaking, or passing.

(2)  In addition to the requirements of Subsection (1), a bus, truck, truck-tractor, trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer shall be equipped with hazard warning lights if the bus, truck, truck-tractor, trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer is 80 inches or more in overall width or 30 feet or more in overall length.

(3)  The hazard warning lights required under this section shall comply with rules made by the department under Section 41-6a-1601.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 2, 2005 General Session

